New Jersey, session 221, A2343.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    On the day of any election, the board of education of a school district shall not hold classes whenever a public school is used as a polling place.  The board may use the day for in-service training or professional development for the teaching staff members employed by the school district. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall first apply to the general election held in November of 2021.